West Virginia, session 2026, SB643.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. WEST VIRGINIA SUPREME COURT OF APPEALS PUBLIC CAMPAIGN FINANCING PILOT PROGRAM. §3-12-1. Termination of the West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals Public Campaign Financing Program. The West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals Campaign Financing Pilot Program established pursuant to this article will terminate on June 30, 2026: Provided, That on or after July 1, 2026, any unexpended balance remaining in the Supreme Court of Appeals Public Campaign Financing Fund shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund. §3-12-2. Legislative findings and declarations. [Repealed] §3-12-3. Definitions. [Repealed] §3-12-4. Alternative public campaign financing option. [Repealed] §3-12-5. Supreme Court of Appeals Public Campaign Financing Fund. [Repealed] §3-12-6. Sources of revenue for the fund. [Repealed] §3-12-7. Declaration of intent. [Repealed] §3-12-8. Exploratory period; contributions; expenditures. [Repealed] §3-12-9. Qualifying contributions. [Repealed] §3-12-10. Certification of candidates. [Repealed] §3-12-11. Schedule and amount of Supreme Court of Appeals Public Campaign Financing Fund payments. [Repealed] §3-12-12. Restrictions on contributions and expenditures. [Repealed] §3-12-13. Reporting requirements. [Repealed] §3-12-14. Duties of the State Election Commission; Secretary of State. [Repealed] §3-12-15. Criminal penalties. [Repealed] §3-12-16. Civil penalties. [Repealed]The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home